Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.225

Training on vehicular pursuits.

(1) By June 30, 2006, every new full-time law enforcement officer employed, after July 27, 2003, by a state, county, or municipal law enforcement agency shall be trained on vehicular pursuits.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2006, every new full-time law enforcement officer employed by a state, county, or municipal law enforcement agency shall be trained on vehicular pursuits, within six months of employment.

(3) Nothing in chapter 37, Laws of 2003 requires training on vehicular pursuit of any law enforcement officer who is employed in a state, county, or city law enforcement agency on July 27, 2003, beyond that which he or she has received prior to July 27, 2003.

[ 2003 c 37 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—2003 c 37: "The legislature intends to improve the safety of law enforcement officers and the public by providing consistent education and training for officers in the matter of vehicle pursuit. The legislature recognizes there are a multitude of factors which enter into the determination of pursuit and intends that the criminal justice training commission be given the responsibility of identifying those factors and developing appropriate standards for training of law enforcement officers in this area." [ 2003 c 37 s 1.]